Utah statutes.
62A-15-612.   Allocation of pediatric state hospital beds -- Formula.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Pediatric beds" means the total number of patient beds located in the
children's unit and the youth units at the state hospital, as determined by
the superintendent of the state hospital.
(b)  "Mental health catchment area" means a county or group of counties
governed by a local mental health authority.
(2)  The board shall establish by rule a formula to separately allocate to
local mental health authorities pediatric beds for persons who meet the
requirements of Subsection  62A-15-610(2)(b).  On July 1, 1996, 72 pediatric
beds shall be allocated to local mental health authorities under this section.
That number shall be reviewed and adjusted as necessary every three years
according to the state's population of persons under 18 years of age.  All
population figures utilized shall reflect the most recent available population
estimates from the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget.
(3)  The formula established under Subsection (2) becomes effective on July 1,
1996, and shall provide for allocation of beds based on the percentage of the
state's population of persons under the age of 18 located within a mental
health catchment area.  Each community mental health center shall be allocated
at least one bed.
(4)  A local mental health authority may sell or loan its allocation of beds
to another local mental health authority.
(5)  The division shall allocate 72 pediatric beds at the state hospital to
local mental health authorities for their use in accordance with the formula
established under this section.  If a local mental health authority is unable
to access a bed allocated to it under that formula, the division shall provide
that local mental health authority with funding equal to the reasonable,
average daily cost of an acute care bed purchased by the local mental health
authority.
(6)  The board shall periodically review and make changes in the formula
established under Subsection (2) as necessary to accurately reflect changes in
the state's population.
